zh-TW: 水球比賽核准: 歐洲水上運動聯合會 (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; 訓練/休閒用; 美國水球協會 (USA Water Polo); 未核准; 其他
lt-LT: Vandensvydžio varžybų patvirtinimas: Europos vandens sporto šakos („LEN“); „FINA“; „HabaWaba“; „NCAA“; „NFHS“; „Splashball“; Treniruotėms / rekreacinis; „USA Water Polo“; Nepatvirtintas; Kita
ru: Допуск к соревнованиям по водному поло: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Для тренировок/любительские; USA Water Polo; Не одобрено; Другое
nl: Waterpolo wedstrijdgoedkeuring: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Training/recreatief; USA Water Polo; Niet goedgekeurd; Overige
hr-HR: Oodbrenje za vaterpolo natjecanje: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Treninzi/rekreativno; USA Water Polo; Neodobreno; Ostalo
pl: Zatwierdzenie piłki do water polo: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Treningowa/rekreacyjna; USA Water Polo; Brak atestu; Inne
hu: Vízilabdaverseny jóváhagyása: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Edzés/szabadidős; USA Water Polo; Nem jóváhagyott; Egyéb
pt-PT: Aprovação para competição de polo aquático: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Treino/recreativo; USA Water Polo; Não aprovado; Outro
fi: Vesipallon kilpailuhyväksyntä: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Harjoittelu/virkistys; USA Water Polo; Ei hyväksytty; Muu
sk-SK: Súťaž vo vodnom póle schválená: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Tréningové/rekreačné; USA Water Polo; Neschválené; Iné
ja: 水球競技認証: 欧州水泳連盟 (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; スプラッシュボール; トレーニング/レクリエーション; USAウォーターポロ; 未承認; その他
sl-SI: Odobritev žoge za tekmovanja v vaterpolu: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Trening / rekreacija; USA Water Polo; Neodobreno; Drugo
zh-CN: 水球比赛批准: 欧洲水上运动联合会 (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; 儿童水球; 训练/休闲; 美国水球协会; 未获批准; 其他
pt-BR: Polo aquático aprovação para competição: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Treino/recreação; USA Water Polo; Não aprovado; Outros
el: Έγκριση αγώνων υδατοσφαίρισης: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Προπόνηση/Αναψυχή; USA Water Polo; Μη εγκεκριμένο; Άλλο
it: Omologazione per competizione di pallanuoto: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Allenamento/ricreativo; USA Water Polo; Non approvato; Altro
sv: Vattenpolo – tävlingsgodkännande: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Träning/fritid; USA Water Polo; Ej godkänd; Övrigt
ro-RO: Aprobare pentru competiții de polo pe apă: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Antrenament / Recreațional; USA Water Polo; Neaprobat; Altele
de: Wettkampfzulassung des Wasserballs: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Training/Freizeit; USA Water Polo; Nicht zugelassen; Sonstige
vi: Cuộc thi bóng nước được phê duyệt: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Tập luyện/Giải trí; USA Water Polo; Không được phê duyệt; Khác
fr: Homologation en compétition de water-polo: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Entraînement/loisir; USA Water Polo; Non approuvé; Autre
tr: Su topu müsabaka onayı: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Antrenman/eğlence; USA Water Polo; Onaylanmamış; Diğer
da: Konkurrencegodkendelse for vandpolobold: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Træning/fritid; USA Water Polo; Ikke godkendt; Andet
es: Aprobación para competición de waterpolo: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Entrenamiento/recreacional; USA Water Polo; No aprobado; Otro
cs: Oficiální schválení pro vodní pólo: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Tréninkové/rekreační; USA Water Polo; Neschváleno; Jiné
nb: Godkjenning av vannpoloturnering: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Trening/fritid; USA Water Polo; Ikke godkjent; Annet
en: Water polo competition approval: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; Training/Recreational; USA Water Polo; Unapproved; Other
bg-BG: Одобрение за състезания по водна топка: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; За тренировки/развлечение; USA Water Polo; Без одобрение; Друго
ko: 수구 경기 승인: 유럽 수영 연맹(LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; 스플래시볼; 훈련/레크리에이션용; USA Water Polo; 미승인; 기타
th: การอนุมัติการแข่งขันโปโลน้ำ: European Aquatics (LEN); FINA; HabaWaba; NCAA; NFHS; Splashball; ฝึกซ้อม/นันทนาการ; USA Water Polo; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; อื่นๆ